Utah statutes.
63G-3-305.   Agency review of rules -- Schedule of filings -- Limited
exemption for certain rules.
(1)  Each agency shall review each of its rules within five years of the
rule's original effective date or within five years of the filing of the last
five-year review, whichever is later.  Rules effective prior to 1992 need not
be reviewed until 1997.
(2)  An agency may consider any substantial review of a rule to be a five-year
review.  If the agency chooses to consider a review a five-year review, it
shall follow the procedures outlined in Subsection (3).
(3)  At the conclusion of its review, the agency shall file a notice of review
on or before the anniversary date indicating its intent to continue, amend, or
repeal the rule.
(a)  If the agency continues the rule, it shall file a statement which
includes:
(i)  a concise explanation of the particular statutory provisions under which
the rule is enacted and how these provisions authorize or require the rule;
(ii)  a summary of written comments received during and since the last five-
year review of the rule from interested persons supporting or opposing the
rule; and
(iii)  a reasoned justification for continuation of the rule, including
reasons why the agency disagrees with comments in opposition to the rule, if
any.
(b)  If the agency repeals the rule, it shall comply with Section 63G-3-301.
(c)  If the agency amends and continues the rule, it shall comply with the
requirements of Section 63G-3-301 and file the statement required in
Subsection (3)(a).
(4) (a)  The division shall publish the notice and statement in the bulletin.
(b)  The division may schedule the publication of agency notices and
statements, provided that no notice and statement shall be published more than
one year after the review deadline established under Subsection (1).
(5)  The division shall notify an agency of rules due for review at least 180
days prior to the anniversary date.
(6)  If an agency finds that it will not meet the deadline established in
Subsection (1):
(a)  the agency may file an extension prior to the anniversary date with the
division indicating the reason for the extension; and
(b)  the division shall publish notice of the extension in the next issue of
the bulletin.
(7)  An extension permits the agency to file a notice no more than 120 days
after the anniversary date.
(8)  If an agency fails to file a notice of review or extension on or before
the date specified in the notice mandated in Subsection (5), the division
shall:
(a)  publish a notice in the next issue of the bulletin that the rule has
expired and is no longer enforceable;
(b)  remove the rule from the code; and
(c)  notify the agency that the rule has expired.
(9)  After a rule expires, an agency must comply with the requirements of
Section 63G-3-301 to reenact the rule.
(10) (a)  Rules issued under the following provisions related to the
Department of Workforce Services or Labor Commission that are in effect on
July 1, 1997, are not subject to the requirements of this section until July
1, 1998:
(i)  Title 34, Labor in General;
(ii)  Title 34A, Utah Labor Code;
(iii)  Title 35A, Utah Workforce Services Code;
(iv)  Title 40, Chapter 2, Coal Mines; and
(v)  Title 57, Chapter 21, Utah Fair Housing Act.
(b)  Any rule described in Subsection (10)(a) that would have expired on or
after July 1, 1997 but before July 1, 1998, expires July 1, 1998, unless for
that rule the Department of Workforce Services or Labor Commission files:
(i)  the notice of review, described in Subsection (3); or
(ii)  an extension described in Subsection (6).
